Washington statutes.
RCW 16.60.011

Other lawful fences.

All other fences as strong and as well calculated as the fence described in RCW 16.60.010 shall be lawful fences.

[ 1985 c 415 s 23; Code 1881 s 2489; 1873 p 447 s 2; 1871 p 64 s 2; 1869 p 324 s 2; RRS s 5442. Formerly RCW 16.60.010, part.]